Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.012

Consultation with health care practitioner not required for certain treatments.

A consultation and periodic review by an authorized health care practitioner is not required for treatment of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal conditions.

[ 2005 c 501 s 3; 2000 c 171 s 24; 1991 c 12 s 2; 1990 c 297 s 19; 1988 c 185 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1991 c 12 ss 1, 2, 3, 6: See note following RCW 18.74.010.